Louisiana, session 2026, HB1150.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:2111 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2111. Trauma screenings
Each public school shall administer trauma screenings to each student in
grades prekindergarten through twelve during each school year. The Louisiana
Department of Health shall select and provide a screening instrument for this purpose
to each school board.